Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.240

Dumping infected products, containers, prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for a property owner or lessee to permit the piling or dumping, or for a person to pile or dump, any infected product on any property or to pile or dump infected containers where the dumping of the infected products or containers might constitute a source of infestation to horticultural products.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.08.240. Prior: 1943 c 150 s 6; 1941 c 20 s 14; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2849-2e.]